Colorado, session 2026A, HB1169.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of state for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 In Session Laws of Colorado 2025
section 2 of chapter 476 (SB 25-206), amend Part XXI as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XXI
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
(1) ADMINISTRATION DIVISION
Personal Services 3,064,415
3,144,336
(26.3 FTE)
(26.7 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 2,155,332
2,226,904
Short-term Disability 10,768
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 69,222
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 1,538,256
Salary Survey 422,995
Step Pay 48,752
PERA Direct Distribution 279,279
Workers' Compensation 89,295
Operating Expenses 537,100
542,302
Legal Services 1,518,847
Outside Legal Services 25,000
Administrative Law Judge
Services 10,576
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 156,118
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1169

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Vehicle Lease Payments 11,538
10,575
Leased Space 1,499,579
Payments to OIT 328,536
173,710
CORE Operations 3,877
Electronic Recording
Technology Board 3,540,546
Indirect Cost Assessment 238,824
Discretionary Fund 5,000
15,553,855 15,553,855a
15,554,761 15,554,761a
a Of this amount, $12,013,309 $12,014,215 shall be from the Department of State Cash Fund created in Section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S. and $3,540,546(I) shall be from the Electronic
Recording Technology Fund created in Section 24-21-404 (1)(a), C.R.S. Appropriations from the Electronic Recording Technology Fund are shown for informational purposes only
as the fund is continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant to Section 24-21-404 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(2) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DIVISION
Personal Services 7,372,054
(48.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 4,396,219
4,398,314
11,768,273 4,254 11,764,019a
11,770,368 11,766,114a
a This amount shall be from the Department of State Cash Fund created in Section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1169

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(3) ELECTIONS DIVISION
Personal Services 4,302,622 4,302,622a
(47.1 FTE)
Operating Expenses 514,189 514,189a
Help America Vote Act
Program 210,000 210,000b
Local Election
Reimbursement102 10,746,664 10,746,664a
Initiative and Referendum 165,000 165,000a
Document Management 802,526 802,526a
16,741,001
a These amounts shall be from the Department of State Cash Fund created in Section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $200,000 shall be from the Department of State Cash Fund created in Section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S., and shall be transferred into the Federal Elections Assistance
Fund created in Section 1-1.5-106 (1)(a), C.R.S., which is continuously appropriated to the Department of State for the implementation of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002,
pursuant to Section 1-1.5-106 (2)(b), C.R.S., and $10,000(I) shall be from the Federal Elections Assistance Fund created in Section 1-1.5-106 (1)(a), C.R.S. which is continuously
appropriated to the Department of State for the implementation of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 pursuant to Section 1-1.5-106 (2)(b), C.R.S., and is shown for informational
purposes only. Appropriations from the Federal Elections Assistance Fund do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
(4) BUSINESS AND LICENSING DIVISION
Personal Services 3,691,190
(51.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 180,065
Business Intelligence Center
Personal Services 318,095
4,189,350 4,189,350a
a This amount shall be from the Department of State Cash Fund created in Section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1169

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART XXI
(STATE) $48,252,479 $4,254 $48,248,225a
$48,255,480 $48,251,226a
a Of this amount, $3,550,546 contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
102 Department of State, Elections Division, Local Election Reimbursement -- If actual reimbursements to counties required by section 1-5-505.5, C.R.S., exceed
the cash funds amount specified in this line item, the Department may spend up to 115.0 percent of the cash funds amount specified to make the required
reimbursements.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1169

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1169